Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0815.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a candidate for office shall file a financial disclosure report with the department by not later than May 15 of each year in which there is an election involving a candidate for office, or if the candidate for office files a statement of organization for that candidate's candidate committee after May 15 in order to be nominated by a political party at the political party's nominating convention, the report required to be filed under this subsection must be filed no later than 15 days after that candidate files the statement of organization for that candidate's candidate committee. (2) Beginning after May 15, 2027, a candidate for office shall file a financial disclosure report with the department by not later than April 15 of each year in which there is an election involving a candidate for office, or if the candidate for office files a statement of organization for that candidate's candidate committee after April 15 in order to be nominated by a political party at the political party's nominating convention, the report required to be filed under this subsection must be filed no later than 15 days after that candidate files the statement of organization for that candidate's candidate committee. (3) (2) If a candidate for office who is required to file a report under this act receives notice from the secretary of state under section 13(1)(h), the candidate for office shall, not later than 9 business days after receiving the notice, file corrections to the errors or omissions or file the report, as applicable. (3) A candidate for office shall file the financial disclosure report for the reporting period of January 1, 2024 to December 31, 2024 not later than June 13, 2025. (4) If a candidate for office is not elected, that candidate for office is not required to file the report required under this section for any year after the year in which the candidate for office ran for that public office unless that candidate runs again as a candidate for office. (5) If a candidate for office is required to report under the public officers financial disclosure act, 2023 PA 281, MCL 15.701 to 15.715, the candidate for office is not required to file a report under this act.